test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-leiri_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - leiri: # adjectives 'big / leiri' - full paradigm
     leiri+N+Sg+Nom: leiri
     leiri+N+Sg+Gen: leirin
     leiri+N+Sg+Acc: [leiri, leirin]
     leiri+N+Sg+Par: leirii
     leiri+N+Sg+Tra: leirikse
     leiri+N+Sg+Abe: [leiritä, leirittäh]
     leiri+N+Sg+Com: leirinke
     leiri+N+Sg+Ine: leiris
     leiri+N+Sg+Ela: [leirispäi, leiris]
     leiri+N+Sg+Ill: leirih
     leiri+N+Sg+Ade: leiril
     leiri+N+Sg+Abl: [leirilpäi, leiril]
     leiri+N+Sg+All: leirile
     leiri+N+Sg+Ess: leirinny
     leiri+N+Sg+Ter: leirissäh
     leiri+N+Sg+Apr: leirillyö
     leiri+N+Pl+Nom: leirit
     leiri+N+Pl+Gen: [leirien, leirilöin]
     leiri+N+Pl+Acc: leirit
     leiri+N+Pl+Par: [leirii, leirilöi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Tra: [leirikse, leirilöikse]
     leiri+N+Pl+Abe: [leiritä, leirittäh, leirilöitä, leirilöittäh]
     leiri+N+Pl+Com: [leirienke, leirilöinke]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ine: [leiris, leirilöis]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ela: [leirispäi, leiris, leirilöispäi, leirilöis]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ill: [leirih, leirilöih]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ade: [leiril, leirilöil]
     leiri+N+Pl+Abl: [leirilpäi, leiril, leirilöilpäi, leirilöil]
     leiri+N+Pl+All: [leirile, leirilöile]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ess: [leirinny, leirilöinny]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ins: [leirin, leirilöin]
     leiri+N+Pl+Apr: [leiriellyö, leirilöillyö]
     leiri+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: leirigi
     leiri+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: leiringi
     leiri+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [leirigi, leiringi]
     leiri+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: leiridygi
     leiri+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: leiriksegi
     leiri+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [leiritägi, leirittähgi]
     leiri+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: leirinkegi
     leiri+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: leirisgi
     leiri+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [leirispäigi, leirisgi]
     leiri+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: leirihgi
     leiri+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: leirilgi
     leiri+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [leirilpäigi, leirilgi]
     leiri+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: leirilegi
     leiri+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: leirinnygi
     leiri+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: leirissähgi
     leiri+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: leirillyögi
     leiri+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: leiritgi
     leiri+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: [leiriengi, leirilöingi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: leiritgi
     leiri+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: [leiriigi, leirilöigi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: [leiriksegi, leirilöiksegi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [leiritägi, leirittähgi, leirilöitägi, leirilöittähgi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: [leirienkegi, leirilöinkegi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: [leirisgi, leirilöisgi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [leirispäigi, leirisgi, leirilöispäigi, leirilöisgi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: [leirihgi, leirilöihgi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: [leirilgi, leirilöilgi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [leirilpäigi, leirilgi, leirilöilpäigi, leirilöilgi]
     leiri+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: [leirilegi, leirilöilegi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: [leirinnygi, leirilöinnygi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: [leiringi, leirilöingi]
     leiri+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: [leiriellyögi, leirilöillyögi]
